Washington statutes.
RCW 19.56.010

Newspaper mailed without authority is gift.

Whenever any person, company or corporation owning or controlling any newspaper or periodical of any kind, or whenever any editor or proprietor of any such newspaper or periodical shall mail or send any such newspaper or periodical to any person or persons in this state without first receiving an order for said newspaper or periodical from such person or persons to whom said newspaper or periodical is mailed or sent, it shall be deemed to be a gift, and no debt or obligation shall accrue against such person or persons, whether said newspaper or periodical is received by the person or persons to whom it is sent or not.

[ 2000 c 171 s 55; 1890 p 460 s 1; RRS s 5842.]